District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.39

Earned income.

Earned income includes income or resources in cash or in kind earned by an individual through the receipt of wages, salaries, commissions, or profit from activities in which he or she is self-employed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 539, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-205.39.